Tennessee, session 114, SB0637.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-3-105(b), is amended by
designating subdivision (5) as subdivision (6) and adding the following as a new subdivision (5):
(5) The weighted allocation for a student who resides in an LEA with a
membership between one thousand one (1,001) and one thousand two hundred fifty
(1,250), both inclusive, is three percent (3%); and
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0637
001444
- 1 -